Arkansas, session 2025, SB314.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 5-70-103(b), concerning the penalties
associated with sexual solicitation, is amended to read as follows:
(b) Sexual solicitation is an unclassified misdemeanor with the
following sentences:
(1) For a first offense:, a Class A misdemeanor
(A) No more than ninety (90) days' imprisonment;
(B) A fine of no more than two thousand dollars ($2,000);
or
(C) Both imprisonment and a fine; and
(2) For a second or subsequent offense, a Class D felony:
(A) No more than one (1) year of imprisonment;
(B) A fine of no more than three thousand five hundred
dollars ($3,500); or
(C) Both imprisonment and a fine.

*TNL216*
02/26/2025 9:27:24 AM TNL216